Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.199

Horseless carriage license plate.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5127-S.SL) ***

"Horseless carriage license plate" is a special license plate that may be assigned to a vehicle that is at least forty years old.

[ 2017 c 147 s 1; 2010 c 161 s 120.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.